Indiana, session 2026, SB223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-4.1-24-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 283, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) A state provider shall
prepare a written report concerning:
(1) its workforce related programs annually; and
(2) a new workforce related program not later than thirty (30)
days after establishing the program.
(b) At a minimum, the following information must be provided in
an annual report for each program:
(1) A description of the program that includes an explanation of
how the program aligns with Indiana's workforce needs and
coordinates with existing workforce related programs.
(2) The amount of funding provided for the program and the
source or sources of the funding.
(3) The number of individuals participating in the program.
(4) Demographic information about the individuals participating
in the program, including:
SB 223—LS 6987/DI 141


(A) the age or ages of the program participants; and
(B) the education attainment level of the program participants.
(5) The results of the program, including:
(A) the number of individuals completing the program;
(B) the number and types of degrees, certificates, credentials,
and certifications awarded, and whether the degrees,
certificates, credentials, and certifications are industry
recognized, if a degree, certificate, credential, or certification
is awarded at the completion of the program;
(C) the extent to which participants in the program obtained
employment, retained employment, or secured better
employment as the direct result of participating in or
completing the program, including the number of participants
placed at the completion of or departure from the program and
within one (1) year after program completion or departure;
(D) a description of the specific jobs that participants in the
program obtained or retained;
(E) the wages offered to and earned by the participants both
before and after participation in or completion of the program,
including the starting wages at placement of participants
completing the program; and
(F) the retention rates of participants who obtained
employment or secured better employment as the direct result
of participating in or completing the program;
(G) the number of participants who participated in
another workforce related program after completing the
program; and
(H) the average increase in a participant's wages after the
participant's completion of a workplace related program.
(c) At a minimum, the report for a new workforce related program
must include the information described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2).
(d) A state provider shall provide a copy of a report described in
subsection (a) to the:
(1) governor;
(2) legislative council; and
(3) department.
An annual report must be submitted on or before October 1 for the
preceding state fiscal year. A report concerning a new workforce
related program must be submitted not later than thirty (30) days after
a state provider establishes the program. A report provided under this
subsection to the legislative council must be in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6.
SB 223—LS 6987/DI 141


SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "state provider" has the meaning set forth in
IC 22-4.1-1-5.5.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "workforce related program" has
the meaning set forth in IC 22-4.1-1-7(a).
(c) Not later than November 1, 2026, a state provider shall:
(1) develop a plan to collect information from participants in
each of the state provider's workforce related programs after
completion of the workforce related program to monitor
outcomes for the participants, including the information
described in IC 22-4.1-24-2(b)(5)(C) through
IC 22-4.1-24-2(b)(5)(H), as added by this act; and
(2) submit, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, a report
describing the plan developed under subdivision (1) to the
legislative council.
(d) A state provider shall allow a participant to provide the
information under subsection (c)(1) anonymously.
(e) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
SB 223—LS 6987/DI 141


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Commerce and
Technology, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 223, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 2, line 24, delete "and".
Page 2, line 27, delete "program." and insert "program; and
(H) the average increase in a participant's wages after the
participant's completion of a workplace related program.".
Page 2, line 41, after "(a)" insert "As used in this SECTION, "state
provider" has the meaning set forth in IC 22-4.1-1-5.5.
(b)".
Page 3, line 2, delete "(b)" and insert "(c)".
Page 3, line 2, delete "the department of" and insert "a state
provider".
Page 3, line 3, delete "workforce development".
Page 3, line 5, delete "a" and insert "each of the state provider's".
Page 3, line 5, delete "program" and insert "programs".
Page 3, line 8, delete "IC 22-4.1-24-2(b)(5)(G)," and insert "IC
22-4.1-24-2(b)(5)(H),".
Page 3, line 13, delete "(c) The department of workforce
development" and insert "(d) A state provider".
Page 3, line 14, delete "(b)(1)" and insert "(c)(1)".
Page 3, line 16, delete "(d)" and insert "(e)".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 223 as introduced.)
BUCHANAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0.
SB 223—LS 6987/DI 141